Florida, session 2026, SB202.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âSection 627.4263, Florida Statutes, is created 24 to read: 25 627.4263âMandatory human reviews of claim denials.â 26 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 27 (a)ââAlgorithmâ means a clearly specified mathematical 28 process for computation which uses rules designed to give 29 prescribed results. 30 (b)ââArtificial intelligence systemâ means a machine-based 31 system that may have varying levels of autonomy and that can, 32 for a given set of objectives, generate outputs, such as 33 predictions, recommendations, or content, influencing decisions 34 made in real or virtual environments. 35 (c)ââMachine learning systemâ means an artificial 36 intelligence system that has the ability to learn from provided 37 data without being explicitly programmed. 38 (d)ââQualified human professionalâ means an individual who, 39 under the Florida Insurance Code, has the authority to adjust or 40 deny a claim or a portion of a claim and may exercise such 41 authority over a particular claim. 42 (2)âAn insurerâs decision to deny a claim or any portion of 43 a claim must be made by a qualified human professional. 44 (3)âA qualified human professional shall, before 45 determining whether to adjust or deny a claim or a portion of a 46 claim, do all of the following: 47 (a)âAnalyze the facts of the claim and the terms of the 48 insurance policy independently of any artificial intelligence 49 system, machine learning system, or algorithm. 50 (b)âReview the accuracy of any output generated by such a 51 system or algorithm. 52 (c)âConduct any review of a claim adjustment or claim 53 decision that was made by another qualified human professional. 54 (4)âAn insurer shall maintain detailed records of the 55 actions of qualified human professionals who are required to 56 perform the actions under subsection (3), including: 57 (a)âThe name and title of the qualified human professional 58 who made the decision to deny a claim or a portion of a claim 59 and of any qualified human professional who reviewed a claim 60 adjustment or claim decision. 61 (b)âThe date and time of the claim decision and of any 62 review of the claim adjustment. 63 (c)âDocumentation of the basis for the denial of the claim 64 or a portion of the claim, including any information provided by 65 an algorithm, an artificial intelligence system, or a machine 66 learning system. 67 (5)âAn algorithm, an artificial intelligence system, or a 68 machine learning system may not serve as the sole basis for 69 determining whether to adjust or deny a claim. 70 (6)âIn all denial communications to a claimant, an insurer 71 shall: 72 (a)âClearly identify the qualified human professional who 73 made the decision to deny the claim or a portion of the claim; 74 and 75 (b)âInclude a statement affirming that an algorithm, an 76 artificial intelligence system, or a machine learning system did 77 not serve as the sole basis for determining whether to deny the 78 claim or a portion of the claim. 79 (7)âAn insurer that uses an algorithm, an artificial 80 intelligence system, or a machine learning system as part of its 81 claims-handling process shall detail in its claims-handling 82 manual the manner in which such systems are to be used and the 83 manner in which the insurer complies with this section. 84 (8)âThe office may conduct market conduct examinations and 85 investigations or use any method it deems necessary to verify 86 compliance with this section. 87 (9)âThe commission may adopt rules to implement this 88 section. 89 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.